Alaska, session 34, HB380.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 14.16.200(b) is amended to read: 04 (b) Costs that may be claimed by a district for reimbursement under (a) of this 05 section are 06 (1) one round trip on the least expensive means of transportation 07 between the student's community of residence and the school during the school year if 08 the district expends money for the trip; and 09 (2) a per-pupil monthly stipend to cover room and board expenses as 10 determined by the department on a regional basis and not to exceed the following 11 amounts: 12 (A) for the Southeast Region (Region I), $1,549 [$1,230]; 13 (B) for the Southcentral Region (Region II), $1,512 [$1,200]; 14 (C) for the Interior Region (Region III), $1,829 [$1,452]; 15 (D) for the Southwest Region (Region IV), $1,901 [$1,509]; 01 (E) for the Northern Remote Region (Region V), $2,237 02 [$1,776]. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.